Arkansas, session 2025, SB82.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Because Arkansas is a rural state, having reliable personal
transportation is essential for Arkansans to maintain employment, access
medical care, and obtain groceries and other daily necessities;
(2) Many working Arkansans have limited income and need
affordable personal transportation, which is impeded by the added expense of
sales and use tax on motor vehicles;
(3) The majority of motor vehicles that are sold for fifteen
*JLL104*
04-01-2025 10:29:36 JLL104

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB82
thousand dollars ($15,000) or less are used motor vehicles, which means that
sales or use tax has been collected previously on those motor vehicles at
least one (1) time and often multiple times for motor vehicles that have been
sold several times; and
(4) Arkansans who can afford only a motor vehicle valued at
fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) or less often have to trade motor vehicles
more often than those who can afford more expensive motor vehicles, which
results in these Arkansans continually having to pay sales or use tax on
motor vehicle purchases even though they have the least ability to afford the
repeated payment of those taxes.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-52-324(a), concerning the special tax
rate for certain used motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers, is amended
to read as follows:
(a) In lieu of the gross receipts or gross proceeds taxes levied under
§§ 26-52-301 and 26-52-302, there is levied an excise tax on the gross
receipts or gross proceeds derived from the sale of a used motor vehicle,
trailer, or semitrailer that has a sales price of at least four thousand
dollars ($4,000) but less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) the following
at the rate of two and eight hundred seventy-five thousandths percent
(2.875%):
(1) A used motor vehicle that has a sales price of at least ten
thousand dollars ($10,000) but less than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000);
and
(2) A used trailer or semitrailer that has a sales price of at
least four thousand dollars ($4,000) but less than ten thousand dollars
($10,000).

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 26-52-324, concerning the special tax rate
for certain used motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers, is amended to
add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(f) This section does not affect the exemptions provided under § 26-
52-436.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 26-52-510(b)(1)(B), concerning the direct
payment of sales tax by consumer-users on new and used motor vehicles,
04-01-2025 10:29:36 JLL104

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB82
trailers, or semitrailers, is amended to read as follows:
(B)(i)(a) If the total consideration for the sale of the
new or used motor vehicle, or the new or used trailer, or semitrailer is less
than four thousand dollars ($4,000), no tax is due.
(b) If the total consideration for the sale of
the used motor vehicle is less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), no tax is
due.
(c) If the total consideration for the sale of
a new motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer is four thousand dollars
($4,000) or more, the full gross receipts tax rate levied under this chapter
shall be levied and collected.
(ii) If the total consideration for the sale of a
used motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer is at least four thousand dollars
($4,000) but less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), the gross receipts tax
due shall be determined under § 26-52-324.
(iii) If the total consideration for the sale of a
used motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer is ten thousand dollars ($10,000)
or more:,
(a) The exemption under subdivision
(b)(1)(B)(i)(a) of this section does not apply;
(b) The special tax rate provided in § 26-52-
324 does not apply; and
(c) The the full gross receipts tax rate
levied under this chapter shall be levied and collected.
(iv) If the total consideration for the sale of the
used motor vehicle is at least ten thousand dollars ($10,000) but less than
fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), the gross receipts tax due shall be
determined under § 26-52-324.
(v) If the total consideration for the sale of the
used motor vehicle is fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) or more, the full
gross receipts tax rate levied under this chapter shall be levied and
collected.
(vi) This subdivision (b)(1)(B) does not affect the
exemptions provided under § 26-52-436.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 26-53-126(b)(2), concerning the
04-01-2025 10:29:36 JLL104

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB82
compensating use tax on new and used motor vehicles, trailers, or
semitrailers, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A)(i) If the total consideration for the sale of the new or
used motor vehicle, or the new or used trailer, or semitrailer is less than
four thousand dollars ($4,000), no tax is due.
(ii) If the total consideration for the sale of the
used motor vehicle is less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), no tax is
due.
(iii) If the total consideration for the sale of a
new motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer is four thousand dollars ($4,000)
or more, the full compensating use tax rate levied under this chapter shall
be levied and collected.
(B) If the total consideration for the sale of a used
motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer is at least four thousand dollars
($4,000) but less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), the compensating use
tax due shall be determined under § 26-53-150.
(C) If the total consideration for the sale of a used
motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer is ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or
more:,
(i) The exemption under subdivision (b)(2)(A)(i) of
this section does not apply;
(ii) The special tax rate provided in § 26-53-150
does not apply; and
(iii) The the full compensating use tax rate levied
under this chapter shall be levied and collected.
(D) If the total consideration for the sale of the used
motor vehicle is at least ten thousand dollars ($10,000) but less than
fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), the compensating use tax due shall be
determined under § 26-53-150.
(E) If the total consideration for the sale of the used
motor vehicle is fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) or more, the full
compensating use tax rate levied under this chapter shall be levied and
collected.
(F) This subdivision (b)(2) does not affect the exemptions
provided under § 26-53-144.

04-01-2025 10:29:36 JLL104

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB82
SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 26-53-150(a)(1), concerning the special tax
rate for certain used motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers, is amended
to read as follows:
(a)(1) In lieu of the compensating use taxes levied under §§ 26-53-106
and 26-53-107, there is levied an excise tax for the privilege of storing,
using, distributing, or consuming a used motor vehicle, trailer, or
semitrailer within this state if the sales price of the used motor vehicle,
trailer, or semitrailer is:
(A) For a used motor vehicle, at least ten thousand
dollars ($10,000) but less than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000); and
(B) For a used trailer or semitrailer, at least four
thousand dollars ($4,000) but less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 26-53-150, concerning the special tax rate
for certain used motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers, is amended to
add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(f) This section does not affect the exemptions provided under § 26-
53-144.

SECTION 8. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 2-7 of this act are effective on
the first day of the calendar quarter following the effective date of this
act.

/s/J. Payton












04-01-2025 10:29:36 JLL104